New York, session 2025-2026, S4016.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 323 of the executive law, as added 2 by chapter 513 of the laws of 1988, is amended to read as follows: 3 4. To establish such divisions, programs, schools, and offices as the 4 board deems appropriate to carry out the purposes of this article; 5 provided that the principal offices and programs of the institute shall 6 be located at Medgar Evers college within the city university of New 7 York; 8 § 2. The opening paragraph of subdivision 1 and subdivision 7 of 9 section 322 of the executive law, as added by chapter 513 of the laws of 10 1988, are amended to read as follows: 11 There is hereby created the New York state Martin Luther King, Jr. 12 institute for nonviolence. The institute shall be a public corporation 13 and its membership shall consist of thirteen members as follows: the 14 chancellor of the [state] city university of New York, the commissioner 15 of education of the state of New York, the chairperson of the New York 16 state Martin Luther King, Jr. commission, and ten members to be 17 appointed by the governor. Of the members appointed by the governor, one 18 shall be a member of the New York state senate appointed by the governor 19 on the recommendation of the majority leader, one shall be a member of 20 the New York state senate appointed by the governor on the recommenda- 21 tion of the minority leader, one shall be a member of the New York state 22 assembly appointed by the governor on the recommendation of the speaker 23 of the assembly, one shall be a member of the New York state assembly 24 appointed by the governor on the recommendation of the minority leader; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07564-01-5 S. 4016 2 1 and six shall be members appointed by the governor, no more than three 2 of whom may be members of the same political party. 3 7. Directors other than the chancellor of the [state] city university 4 of New York and the commissioner of education of the state of New York 5 may engage in private employment, or in a profession or business. The 6 corporation, its directors, officers and employees shall be subject to 7 the provisions of sections seventy-three and seventy-four of the public 8 officers law. 9 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 10 the date on which it shall have become a law.